Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-148
Jefferson.

The county of Jefferson is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township one, north, of range one, east; thence east to the southeast corner of township one, north, of range four, east; thence north to the northeast corner of township four, north, of range four, east; thence west to the northwest corner of township four, north, of range one, east; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 29, p. 217;

R.S.1913, § 861;

C.S.1922, § 763;

C.S.1929, § 25-150;

R.S.1943, § 22-148.